Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2485XC (2) 91 th/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 325B.2 Prohibited factors in 1 determining employment status. 2 1. The deployment, implementation, or use of a motor carrier 3 safety improvement by or as required by a motor carrier, or any 4 of the carrierâs related entities, including the use of such 5 improvement in accordance with a motor carrier transportation 6 contract, as defined in section 325B.1, shall not be considered 7 when determining whether a person is an employee, independent 8 contractor, or jointly employed employee under any state law. 9 2. For purposes of this section, âmotor carrier safety 10 improvementâ means any device, equipment, software, technology, 11 procedure, training, policy, program, or operational practice 12 intended and primarily used to improve or facilitate compliance 13 with traffic safety laws, including motor carrier safety, 14 safety of a motor vehicle, safety of the operator of a motor 15 vehicle, and safety of other highway users. 16